Utah statutes.
4-39-306.   Inspection prior to movement, sale, removal of antlers, or
slaughter.
(1)  Each domesticated elk facility licensee shall have the domesticated elk
inspected by the department prior to any transportation, sale, removal of
antlers, or slaughter.
(2)  Any person transporting or possessing domesticated elk or domesticated
elk products shall have the appropriate brand inspection certificate in his or
her possession.
